Utah statutes.
76-10-904.   Corporation guilty of unfair discrimination -- Action by
attorney general.
If complaint is made to the attorney general that any corporation is guilty of
unfair discrimination as defined by the preceding section, he shall
investigate the complaint, and for that purpose, he may subpoena witnesses,
administer oaths, take testimony, and require the production of books or other
documents, and, if in his opinion sufficient grounds exist therefor, he may
prosecute an action in the name of the state in the proper court to annul the
charter or revoke the license of the corporation, as the case may be, and to
permanently enjoin the corporation from doing business in this state, and, if
in the action the court finds that the corporation is guilty of unfair
discrimination as defined by the preceding section, the court shall annul the
charter or revoke the license of the corporation and may permanently enjoin it
from transacting business in this state.
